test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kuaerram_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - kuärram: # Adjective e-stem "sewing/ompeleminen" - full paradigm
     kuärram+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kuärram
     kuärram+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kuärram
     kuärram+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kuärram
     kuärram+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kuärrma
     kuärram+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kuärrmest
     kuärram+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kuärrmin
     kuärram+N+Ess+Indef: kuärrmen
     kuärram+N+Par+Indef: kuärrmed
     kuärram+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kuärramtaa, kuärramtää]
     kuärram+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kuärram
     kuärram+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kuärrmi
     kuärram+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kuärrmid
     kuärram+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kuärrmid
     kuärram+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kuärrmin
     kuärram+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kuärrmivuiʹm
     kuärram+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kuärrmitaa, kuärrmitää]
